Vermont, session 2025-2026, H716.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 30 V.S.A. § 8010 is amended to read:
§ 8010. SELF-GENERATION AND NET METERING
* * *
(c) In accordance with this section, the Commission shall adopt and
implement rules that govern the installation and operation of net metering
systems.
* * *
(2) The rules shall include provisions that govern:
* * *
VT LEG #385617 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.716
2026 Page 2 of 2
(F) the amount of the credit to be assigned to each kWh of electricity
generated by a net metering customer in excess of the electricity supplied by
the interconnecting provider to the customer, the manner in which the
customer’s credit will be applied on the customer’s bill, and the period during
which a net metering customer must use the credit, after which the credit shall
revert to the interconnecting provider.
* * *
(iii) In determining the amount of the credit, the negative adjustor
on net-metered solar production shall not exceed -$0.04 and there shall be no
adjustor on behind-the-meter consumption. As used in this section, “behind-
the-meter consumption” means electricity that is used or stored on-site without
first passing through the provider’s electric meter or otherwise reaching the
grid.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385617 v.2